North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-11 Board of County Commissioners

11-11-01.
Number of county commissioners.

Each organized county shall have a board of county commissioners which shall consist of not less than three nor more than five members.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 15; S.L. 1883, ch. 33, § 3; N.D. Const., § 172; R.C. 1895, § 1890; R.C. 1899, § 1890; R.C. 1905, § 2384; C.L. 1913, § 3257; R.C. 1943, § 11-1101.

11-11-02.
Commissioner must be resident of district — Exceptions.

Each county commissioner shall be chosen by the qualified electors of the district of which the commissioner is a resident, except as otherwise provided in section 11-07-03 or 11-07-06.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 15; S.L. 1883, ch. 33, § 3; R.C. 1895, § 1890; R.C. 1899, § 1890; R.C. 1905, § 2384; C.L. 1913, § 3257; R.C. 1943, § 11-1102; S.L. 1971, ch. 117, § 3; 2009, ch. 110, § 4; 2013, ch. 63, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 63, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

11-11-03.
Term of office of commissioners.

A county commissioner shall hold office for the term of four years except as otherwise provided in this title.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 16; R.C. 1895, § 1896; R.C. 1899, § 1896; S.L. 1901, ch. 52, § 3; 1903, ch. 74, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2390; S.L. 1913, ch. 123, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3264; S.L. 1937, ch. 120, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 11-1103.

Cross-References.

Removal from office, see N.D.C.C. § 44-11-01.

Vacancies, how filled, see N.D.C.C. § 44-02-05.

When term of office begins, see N.D.C.C. § 11-10-05.1.

When to qualify for office, see N.D.C.C. § 11-10-05.

11-11-03.1.
Commissioners’ service on other boards — Term.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a member of a board of county commissioners who is appointed to serve on another board by the board of county commissioners or who is a member of another board because of the individual’s status as a member of the board of county commissioners may serve on the other board only so long as the individual is a member of the board of county commissioners. After the individual is no longer a member of the board of county commissioners, the board of county commissioners may reappoint the individual to serve on the other board unless membership on the board of county commissioners is a requirement of membership.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 88, § 1.

11-11-04.
Specific provisions to be contained in bond of county commissioners.

The bond of a member of the board of county commissioners shall be conditioned for the faithful performance and discharge, according to law, of the official duties of the office and the rendition of a true, accurate, and full account of all business transactions, powers, and trusts of every kind and nature that shall come before the member or into the member’s hands as such officer. The bond shall cover all the business of the county done by the member and shall protect the county against all the member’s acts of omission as well as of commission, including all errors caused by carelessness or inattention in office.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 114, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 667; S.L. 1923, ch. 193, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 667; R.C. 1943, § 11-1104.

Cross-References.

Bond of county commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 11-10-06(2).

11-11-05.
Meetings of board — Time and place.

The board of county commissioners shall meet and hold regular meetings for the transaction of business at a time and place to be designated by the commission on a date certain established by resolution or ordinance of the commission. The county auditor shall have power to call special meetings when the interests of the county demand it. The chairman of the board, or a majority of the members thereof, may call special meetings that must be noticed in accordance with section 44-04-20.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 18; R.C. 1895, § 1898; R.C. 1899, § 1898; R.C. 1905, § 2392; C.L. 1913, § 3266; S.L. 1919, ch. 101, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3266; R.C. 1943, § 11-1105; S.L. 1991, ch. 105, § 1; 2009, ch. 114, § 1.

11-11-05.1.
Joint meetings of boards of county commissioners for consideration of levies of taxing districts in multiple counties.

If feasible, the boards of county commissioners of affected counties shall hold joint public hearings and deliberations when considering the proposed property tax levy of a taxing district seeking authority for a levy against property within multiple counties. If joint hearing and deliberation is not feasible, the boards of county commissioners of affected counties shall coordinate their levy directives to be applied to property within the taxing district.

Source:

S.L. 2016 ch. 88, § 7, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

Effective Date.

This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

11-11-06.
Sessions of board to be public — County matters heard at session only.

The meetings of the board of county commissioners shall be open to the public. All matters pertaining to the affairs of the county shall be considered by the board in session only, but it may continue any business from a regular session to a day between regular sessions.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 40; R.C. 1895, § 1920; R.C. 1899, § 1920; R.C. 1905, § 2415; C.L. 1913, § 3290; R.C. 1943, § 11-1106.

11-11-07.
Quorum — Tie vote defers decision.

A majority of the members elected or appointed to the board of county commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of its business. When the board is equally divided on any question, it shall defer its decision thereon until its next meeting, at which time the matter shall be decided by a majority of the members of the board.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 21; R.C. 1895, § 1900; R.C. 1899, § 1900; R.C. 1905, § 2394; C.L. 1913, § 3268; R.C. 1943, § 11-1107.

11-11-08.
Chairman — Election — Duties.

At the first meeting of the board of county commissioners each year, the members of the board shall elect one of their number chairman, who shall act as chairman of such board during the year in which the chairman is elected or until the chairman’s successor is elected, and in case of a vacancy from any cause whatever, the board shall elect another chairman. The chairman shall preside at the meetings of the board. All orders made by the board shall be signed by the chairman and attested by the county auditor as clerk of the board, except that claim vouchers or other orders directed to the auditor as authorization for the issuance of warrants shall not be attested by the auditor.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, §§ 19, 20; R.C. 1895, § 1899; R.C. 1899, § 1899; R.C. 1905, § 2393; C.L. 1913, § 3267; S.L. 1943, ch. 108, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1108.

11-11-09.
County seal.

The board of county commissioners shall procure and keep a seal with such emblems and devices as it may think proper, which shall be the seal of the county, and no other seal shall be used by the county auditor. The impression of the seal shall be sufficient sealing in all cases when sealing is required.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 17; R.C. 1895, § 1897; R.C. 1899, § 1897; R.C. 1905, § 2391; C.L. 1913, § 3265; R.C. 1943, § 11-1109.

11-11-10.
Power of board to preserve order — Fines — Collection.

The board of county commissioners has power to preserve order when sitting as a board and may punish contempts by fines of not more than five dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than twenty-four hours. The board may enforce obedience to its orders by attachment or other compulsory process, and when fines are assessed by it, they may be collected before any district judge having jurisdiction, and, within ten days after they are collected, must be paid into the treasury of the county to be added to the state school fund.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 23; R.C. 1895, § 1902; R.C. 1899, § 1902; R.C. 1905, § 2396; C.L. 1913, § 3270; R.C. 1943, § 11-1110; S.L. 1981, ch. 320, § 15; 1991, ch. 326, § 16.

11-11-11.
General duties of board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners:

Shall superintend the fiscal affairs of the county.

Shall supervise the conduct of the respective county officers.

May cause to be audited and verified the accounts of all officers having the custody, management, collection, or disbursement of any moneys belonging to the county or received in their official capacity.

Before November fifteenth of each year, shall have the county auditor prepare general purpose financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Public notice that financial statements have been prepared and are available for inspection must be published in the official newspaper.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 30; R.C. 1895, § 1907; R.C. 1899, § 1907; R.C. 1905, § 2401; S.L. 1911, ch. 118, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3276; S.L. 1943, ch. 124, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1111; S.L. 1987, ch. 144, § 1; 1991, ch. 106, § 1; 2019, ch. 59, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Aid to county fair, see N.D.C.C. § 4-02-26.

Bridges, see N.D.C.C. § 24-08-01 et seq.

County commissioners members of board of county park commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 11-28-01.

Designation of voting places, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-04-02.

Highways, change in, see N.D.C.C. § 24-07-04.

Incorporation of municipalities, see N.D.C.C. § 40-02-01 et seq.

Organization of township, see N.D.C.C. §§ 58-02-01 to 58-02-03.

Powers of board of county commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 11-11-14.

Road fund, how expended, see N.D.C.C. § 24-05-02.

11-11-12.
Board of county commissioners to provide courts with supplies and attendants. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 326, § 203.

11-11-13.
Board to ascertain amount of satisfaction of tax lien money.

The board of county commissioners, at the first meeting of the board each year, shall examine the county treasurer’s satisfaction of tax lien book and stub receipts and ascertain the amount of satisfaction of tax lien money in the treasury, and shall require the treasurer to account for the same.

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 49, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 1933; R.C. 1899, § 1933; R.C. 1905, § 2429; C.L. 1913, § 3304; R.C. 1943, § 11-1113; S.L. 1999, ch. 503, § 1.

Cross-References.

Failure of treasurer to account, penalty, see N.D.C.C. § 11-10-18.

11-11-14.
Powers of board of county commissioners.

The board of county commissioners shall have the following powers:

To institute and prosecute civil actions for and on behalf of the county and in its name.

To make all orders respecting property of the county.

To levy a tax not exceeding the amount authorized by law.

To control the finances, to contract debts and borrow money, to make payments of debts and expenses, to establish charges for any county or other services, and to control the property of the county.

To construct and repair bridges and to open, lay out, vacate, and change highways in the cases provided by law. But the board may not contract for the construction of bridges costing more than one hundred dollars without first complying with the provisions of chapter 24-08.

To establish election precincts in the county in areas outside the boundaries of incorporated cities except as provided in chapter 16.1-04.

To equalize the assessments of the county in the manner provided by law.

To furnish to the county officers the necessary telephone, postage, telephone and telegraph tolls, and all other things necessary and incidental to the performance of the duties of their respective offices to be paid out of the county treasury.

To furnish a fireproof safe in which to keep all the books, records, vouchers, and papers pertaining to the business of the board.

To dispose of property of the county in the manner provided in chapter 11-27.

To purchase lands in lieu of those sold.

To grant to any person the right of way for the erection of telephone lines, electric light systems, water or wastewater systems, or gas or oil pipeline systems over, under, or upon public grounds, county streets, roads, or highways.

To establish a garbage and trash collection system encompassing all or any part of the territory of the county. The words “garbage and trash collection system” include the operation and maintenance of one or more sanitary landfill sites, or other types of processing sites for the disposal of trash and garbage. The board may operate such system in cooperation with any one or more political subdivisions of this or any other state in accordance with chapter 54-40. The board may borrow money by issuing certificates of indebtedness, repayable from fees or special assessments, or both, which may be charged to the proper parcels of land or to persons receiving the direct benefits of the garbage and trash collection system, or repayable in such other manner as may be provided by law, in order to purchase the initial equipment and land necessary for operation of the system. If the board resolves to establish such a system, the expenses of establishing, operating, and maintaining it may be financed by fees charged to persons receiving direct benefits or by special assessment against the parcels of land properly charged therewith, or by both such fees and assessments. The assessment may be made, published, altered, appealed from, and confirmed under the procedures set forth in chapter 11-28.1.

To maintain, in its discretion, all public roads and private highways and roads that are being used as part of regularly scheduled public schoolbus routes.

To expend county funds for the purpose of participating in an organization of county governments pursuant to section 11-10-24. This subsection does not authorize a mill levy, and the limitations embodied in section 57-15-06 apply to expenditures under this subsection, which expenditures shall be from the county general fund.

To expend county funds to finance in part or entirely for county employees a group insurance program for hospital benefits, medical benefits or life insurance, and a group retirement program through either the state retirement program or a private company.

To do and perform any other duties prescribed by law.

To loan or grant money to and secure a mortgage from individuals, associations, corporations, or limited liability companies and to purchase ownership shares in corporations, limited liability companies, or other business associations as provided through the procedures established by the state’s community development block grant program established pursuant to the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 [Pub. L. 93-383; 88 Stat. 633; 42 U.S.C. 5301 et seq.]. This power applies to all community development block grant transactions of the board of county commissioners, including any transactions prior to July 1, 1987. The county is not lending its funds or extending its credit to any individual, association, or organization under this subsection and no general liability on the part of the county is incurred.

To license, tax, and regulate pawnbrokers outside of municipalities.

To acquire by lease, purchase, gift, condemnation, or other lawful means and to hold in its name for use and control as provided by law, both real and personal property and easements and rights of way within the county for all purposes authorized by law or necessary to the exercise of any power granted.

To participate and enact or adopt ordinances and resolutions necessary for participation in the nation’s historic preservation program as a certified local government, as provided for under 36 CFR 61.6.

To regulate the confinement and control of dogs, cats, and other household pets, provided the regulations do not conflict with rules adopted by the state board of animal health.

To require that financial records, including all revenues, expenditures, fund balances, and complete budgets, be submitted to the board of county commissioners at a time and in a format requested by the board by all boards, authorities, committees, and commissions with members appointed by the board of county commissioners before the board’s consideration of the budget and tax levy.

To expend county funds as a donation for a capital improvement project to a nonprofit health care facility within the county.

To expend county funds for eradication of gophers, prairie dogs, rabbits, crows, or magpies.

To expend county funds to enhance communications infrastructure for countywide benefit.

To provide for the planning, design, acquisition, development, operation, maintenance, and support of automation and telecommunications resources.

To provide for firebreaks and other fire protection and suppression measures.

To construct, equip, operate, and maintain county buildings, including court facilities, correction centers, jails, and other law enforcement facilities.

To require that all financial records, including all revenues, expenditures, fund balances, and complete budgets be submitted to the board of county commissioners at a time and in a format requested by the board of county commissioners by all boards, authorities, committees, and commissions appointed by the board of county commissioners before consideration by the board of county commissioners of the budget and levy request.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, §§ 28, 29; R.C. 1895, §§ 1905, 1906; S.L. 1899, ch. 59, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 1905, 1906; R.C. 1905, §§ 2399, 2400; S.L. 1907, ch. 67, § 1; 1911, ch. 115; C.L. 1913, §§ 3273 to 3275; S.L. 1937, ch. 123, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1114; S.L. 1955, ch. 112; 1957 Supp., § 11-1114; S.L. 1967, ch. 158, § 3; 1969, ch. 208, § 1; 1971, ch. 123, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 89, § 1; 1975, ch. 91, § 2; 1975, ch. 92, § 2; 1977, ch. 90, § 1; 1977, ch. 91, § 1; 1979, ch. 162, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 10; 1985, ch. 158, § 1; 1985, ch. 236, § 1; 1985, ch. 453, § 1; 1987, ch. 145, § 1; 1989, ch. 144, § 1; 1989, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 96, § 1; 1995, ch. 110, § 1; 1999, ch. 101, § 1; 2003, ch. 48, § 5; 2015, ch. 88, § 8; 2015, ch. 89, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 12.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 8 of chapter 88, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 89, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Note.

Section 11-11-14 was amended 3 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 89, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1329; Section 8 of Chapter 88, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2056; and Section 12 of Scapter 439, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2144.

Cross-References.

Administration of oaths by county commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 44-05-01.

Appropriation of money to prevent spread of tuberculosis, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-20.

Bridges, procedure for construction, see N.D.C.C. § 24-08-01 et seq.

Clerical help for soil conservation district supervisors, see N.D.C.C. § 4-22-23.1.

County nursing home authority, establishment, see N.D.C.C. § 23-18.2-03.

County safety council or director, designation, see N.D.C.C. § 23-13-11.

Duties relating to county agent, see N.D.C.C. § 4-08-01 et seq.

Fire protection of unorganized townships, see N.D.C.C. § 18-06-11.

General duties of board of county commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 11-11-11.

Licensing retail sale of liquor, see N.D.C.C. § 5-02-01.

Opening and vacating highways, see N.D.C.C. § 24-07-01 et seq.

Poor relief fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 50-03.

Sale by board of county commissioners validated, see N.D.C.C. § 1-08-06.

Vector control district commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 23-24-05.

11-11-15.
Board may obtain copies of field notes and plats made by United States government.

The board of county commissioners may procure for its county certified copies of the field notes and plats of the original surveys by the United States of the lands within its county and may cause a map of the county to be constructed therefrom on a scale of not less than one inch [2.54 centimeters] to a mile [1.61 kilometers] laid off in congressional townships and sections. When obtained, such notes and plats shall be bound substantially in book form, and together with the map of the county, shall be deposited in the office of the county auditor and kept open for the benefit of the public.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 31; R.C. 1895, § 1910; R.C. 1899, § 1910; R.C. 1905, § 2404; S.L. 1907, ch. 72, § 8; C.L. 1913, §§ 3279, 3432; R.C. 1943, § 11-1115.

11-11-16.
Board has power to erect, repair, and maintain buildings from current revenue.

The board of county commissioners may provide for the purchase, erection, repair, and maintenance of the courthouse, hospitals, jails, and other necessary buildings within and for the county. It may purchase the sites for such county buildings if necessary and may make contracts on behalf of the county for the building, repairing, and maintaining thereof if the expenditures therefor are not greater than can be paid out of the revenue of the county for the current year. The board shall have the entire supervision of the construction of such buildings.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 43; R.C. 1895, §§ 1923, 2046; S.L. 1899, ch. 42, § 4; R.C. 1899, §§ 1923, 2046; R.C. 1905, §§ 2419, 2566; C.L. 1913, §§ 3294, 3460; S.L. 1923, ch. 192, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3294; R.C. 1943, § 11-1116.

11-11-17.
Board of county commissioners may supervise the building or repairing of roads, bridges, and property of the county — Compensation.

Whenever the board of county commissioners of any county is required by law to lay out, oversee, and supervise the building or repairing of roads and bridges, including the appointment of a district overseer of highways’ duties in unorganized territory, or the building or repairing of any property owned by the county, the board may appoint or designate one or more members of the board personally to lay out, oversee, or supervise the building or repairing of any such roads, bridges, or property. Each commissioner is entitled to receive as compensation for services the sum of five dollars per day and the mileage provided by law for members of the board of county commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1917, ch. 129, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1946b; R.C. 1943, § 11-1117; S.L. 1999, ch. 102, § 1.

11-11-18.
Board to submit extraordinary outlay to vote. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, §§ 32, 43; R.C. 1895, §§ 1911, 1923; R.C. 1899, §§ 1911, 1923; R.C. 1905, §§ 2405, 2419; S.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 3280, 3294; S.L. 1923, ch. 192, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3294; R.C. 1943, § 11-1118; S.L. 1977, ch. 92, § 1; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-19.
When commissioners may purchase land without election.

If, in the opinion of a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners, acquisition of land is, or may become, necessary for the courthouse or the jail, or for the purpose of beautifying county buildings, or to prevent the erection of other buildings so near to the courthouse and jail that the transaction of public business will be inconvenienced, the board, by a majority vote of its members, may purchase such land without submitting the question to a vote of the electors of the county. The money required for the purchase of the additional land shall be raised in the manner in which money is raised for general county purposes.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 44; R.C. 1895, § 1324; R.C. 1899, § 1311; S.L. 1901, ch. 73, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2406; C.L. 1913, § 3281; R.C. 1943, § 11-1119; S.L. 1985, ch. 159, § 1.

11-11-19.1.
Lease purchase — Building authority.

Unless a lease purchase or building authority agreement is approved by a vote of the majority of the qualified electors of a county, the governing body of a county may not enter a lease purchase or building authority agreement for the acquisition of any property or construction of any structure having a cost of more than four million dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 88, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

11-11-20.
Notice of election on question of extraordinary expenditure. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 34; Pol. C. 1877, ch. 28, § 105; R.C. 1895, §§ 1324, 1912; R.C. 1899, §§ 1311, 1912; S.L. 1901, ch. 73, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 2406, 2407; S.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 3281, 3282; R.C. 1943, § 11-1120; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-21.
Proposition to tax must accompany question submitted. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 35; R.C. 1895, § 1913; R.C. 1899, § 1913; R.C. 1905, § 2408; S.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 3283; R.C. 1943, § 11-1121; 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-22.
Vote necessary — How tax levied and collected. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 28, § 105; R.C. 1895, § 1324; R.C. 1899, § 1311; S.L. 1901, ch. 73, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2406; C.L. 1913, § 3281; R.C. 1943, § 11-1122; 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-23.
Record of vote — Board cannot rescind. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 37; R.C. 1895, § 1915; R.C. 1899, § 1915; R.C. 1905, § 2410; C.L. 1913, § 3285; R.C. 1943, § 11-1123; 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-24.
Limitation on tax levy for extraordinary expenditure. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 36; R.C. 1895, § 1914; R.C. 1899, § 1914; R.C. 1905, § 2409; S.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 3284; R.C. 1943, § 11-1124; S.L. 1983, ch. 593, § 6; 1983, ch. 606, § 12; 1987, ch. 676, § 5; 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-25.
Money applied only to expenditure for which raised. [Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 38; R.C. 1895, § 1916; R.C. 1899, § 1916; R.C. 1905, § 2411; C.L. 1913, § 3286; R.C. 1943, § 11-1125; 2015, ch. 439 § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 104 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

11-11-25.1.
Disposition of unexpended and unencumbered county taxes levied for a specific purpose.

If any county shall levy a tax for a specific purpose and the moneys collected are not expended or encumbered within two years after their collection, the board of county commissioners may deposit such taxes in the county general fund or authorize their expenditure by any political subdivision having authority to carry out the purpose for which the taxes were originally levied.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 100, § 1.

11-11-26.
When board shall advertise for bids for fuel.

For the purchase of fuel when the amount exceeds four thousand dollars, the board of county commissioners shall seek bids either by telephone solicitation from at least two suppliers, or by an advertisement for bids to be published at least once each week for two successive weeks in the official newspaper of the county and in other newspapers as the board deems advisable.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 45; S.L. 1889, ch. 49, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1925; S.L. 1899, ch. 59, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 1925; S.L. 1905, ch. 72, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2421; C.L. 1913, § 3296; S.L. 1921, ch. 49, § 1; 1923, ch. 190, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3296; R.C. 1943, § 11-1126; S.L. 1951, ch. 111, § 1; 1957, ch. 109, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 11-1126; S.L. 1977, ch. 93, § 1; 1991, ch. 107, § 1; 1995, ch. 443, § 1; 2007, ch. 403, § 1; 2015, ch. 90, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 90, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Authority to contract with federal government, see N.D.C.C. § 21-06-08.

Construction of bridges, advertisement for bids, see N.D.C.C. § 24-08-01.

License required for award of contract, see N.D.C.C. § 43-07-12.

Requirements for rental contracts, advertisement, county road equipment, see N.D.C.C. § 24-05-04.

Sealed bids required, time and place of opening, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-01.1.

11-11-27.
Contents of fuel bids advertisement — When bids may be opened — Lowest bidder accepted.

The advertisement must state what type of fuel is required and when the bids will be opened and passed upon by the board of county commissioners. The bids may be opened and passed upon at a regular or adjourned session of the board, or at a meeting called by the county auditor as provided in section 11-11-05. The bid of the lowest responsible bidder must be accepted, but the board

may reject any or all bids.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 45; S.L. 1889, ch. 42, § 4; 1889, ch. 49, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 1925, 2046; S.L. 1899, ch. 59, § 2; R.C. 1899, §§ 1925, 2046; S.L. 1905, ch. 72, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 2421, 2566; C.L. 1913, §§ 3296, 3460; S.L. 1921, ch. 49, § 1; 1923, ch. 190, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3296; R.C. 1943, § 11-1127; 2015, ch. 90, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 90, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Preference to North Dakota bidders and sellers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-08-01.

11-11-28.
Bid must be accompanied by a bond — When certified or cashier’s check allowed.

A bid shall be accompanied by a separate envelope containing a bidder’s bond in a sum equal to five percent of the full amount of the bid, executed by the bidder as principal and by a surety company authorized to do business in this state as a guarantee that the bidder will enter into the contract if it is awarded to the bidder and that the bidder will furnish the necessary bond. When the bid is ten thousand dollars or less, the bidder may in lieu of such bond accompany the bid with a separate envelope containing a certified or cashier’s check equal to five percent of the full amount of the bid made payable to the board with authority and direction to the board that if the bidder is successful in obtaining the award and fails to enter into the contract, the board may endorse, deposit, and receive the face amount of the certified or cashier’s check as liquidated damages.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 45; S.L. 1889, ch. 49, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1925; S.L. 1899, ch. 59, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 1925; S.L. 1905, ch. 72, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2421; C.L. 1913, § 3296; S.L. 1921, ch. 49, § 1; 1923, ch. 190, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3296; R.C. 1943, § 11-1128; S.L. 1961, ch. 124, § 1; 1971, ch. 124, § 1; 1975, ch. 93, § 1; 1979, ch. 91, § 2; 1981, ch. 142, § 1.

11-11-29.
Contract — Form — Contents — Majority vote necessary — When payment made.

A contract shall be entered into under the provisions of this chapter only after it has been approved by the vote of a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners. The contract shall be made in writing and may be signed on behalf of the board by the chairman thereof and the county seal affixed thereto. The contract shall provide that not more than seventy percent of the contract price shall be paid until the contract is executed and completed to the satisfaction and acceptance of the board of county commissioners, its architect, or authorized superintendent. Payment to the extent of seventy percent of the contract price may be made from time to time during the process of construction or as supplies are furnished, and may be divided into such installments as the board may agree upon.

Source:

S.L. 1889, ch. 49, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1925; S.L. 1899, ch. 59, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 1925; S.L. 1905, ch. 72, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2421; C.L. 1913, § 3296; S.L. 1921, ch. 49, § 1; 1923, ch. 190, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3296; R.C. 1943, § 11-1129.

11-11-30.
When contracts for furnishing election supplies let.

Contracts for the furnishing of election ballots and supplies shall be let by the board of county commissioners at its first regular meeting in April of each year to run for a period of one year.

Source:

S.L. 1889, ch. 49, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1925; S.L. 1899, ch. 59, § 2; R.C. 1899, § 1925; S.L. 1905, ch. 72, § 1; R.C. 1905, § 2421; C.L. 1913, § 3296; S.L. 1921, ch. 49, § 1; 1923, ch. 190, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3296; R.C. 1943, § 11-1130.

11-11-31.
Construction of public buildings — Bond of contractor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 443, § 29.

11-11-32.
Commissioners may employ architect — Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 163, § 1.

11-11-33.
Special funds may be transferred.

Whenever there remains in the treasury of a county an unexpended balance of a special fund and all claims against the fund have been paid, and the purpose for which it was created has been subserved fully, and there remains no further use for the balance for the purpose for which the fund was created, the board of county commissioners may transfer the balance to any other fund of the county or to the subdivision to which the balance belongs.

Source:

S.L. 1887, ch. 144, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1918; R.C. 1899, § 1918; R.C. 1905, § 2413; C.L. 1913, § 3288; R.C. 1943, § 11-1133.

11-11-34.
Auditing building accounts of board of county commissioners.

The county auditor, county treasurer, and some qualified elector and freeholder of the county appointed by the board of county commissioners from outside of its own number shall act as a board of auditors to audit accounts of the board of county commissioners in connection with the erection of county buildings. The members of such board of auditors shall receive for their services the sum of three dollars each for every day actually and necessarily employed in such capacity, to be paid upon the warrant of such board of county commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1889, ch. 42, § 5; R.C. 1895, § 2047; R.C. 1899, § 2047; R.C. 1905, § 2567; C.L. 1913, § 3461; R.C. 1943, § 11-1134.

11-11-35.
Board to keep records of proceedings.

The board of county commissioners shall keep a book in which all orders and decisions made by it shall be recorded. Such book shall be known as “a record of the proceedings of the board of county commissioners”. All orders and vouchers for the allowance and payment of moneys from the county treasury shall state on what account and to whom the allowance is made. The same shall be dated and numbered with the number of the warrant issued in payment thereof. Approval of orders and vouchers shall be recorded in the record of the proceedings and this shall be sufficient to indicate approval without requiring a majority of the board to sign or initial the orders and vouchers.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, §§ 25 to 27; R.C. 1895, § 1903; R.C. 1899, § 1903; R.C. 1905, § 2397; C.L. 1913, § 3271; S.L. 1943, ch. 112, § 1, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 11-1135; S.L. 1975, ch. 366, § 1.

11-11-36.
Order of business.

The board of county commissioners shall conduct the business of its meetings under the following order of business:

Meeting called to order by chairman of the board.

Roll call of members.

Reading of minutes of previous meeting, corrections to be made, if any, and approval.

Signing of minutes of previous meeting by the chairman of the board and attesting of the same by the county auditor.

Auditing and disposition of claims against the county either by approval or rejection.

Such other business as may properly come before the board.

Source:

S.L. 1943, ch. 112, § 1, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 11-1136.

11-11-37.
Proceedings of board of county commissioners to be published in official newspaper — When published.

The board of county commissioners shall supply to the official newspaper of the county a full and complete report of its official proceedings at each regular and special meeting no later than seven days after the meeting at which the report is read and approved. The publisher of the official newspaper shall publish the report in the issue of the paper next succeeding the time of its reception and shall file with the county auditor an affidavit of publication executed in the proper form.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, §§ 54, 56; S.L. 1887, ch. 51, § 2; R.C. 1895, §§ 1936, 1938; R.C. 1899, §§ 1936, 1938; R.C. 1905, §§ 2432, 2434; S.L. 1911, ch. 232, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 3308, 3311; S.L. 1919, ch. 187, § 5; I.M. Nov. 2, 1920, § 1, S.L. 1921, p. 256, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 3176a5; R.C. 1943, § 11-1137; S.L. 1971, ch. 125, § 1; 1987, ch. 146, § 1.

Cross-References.

Fees for publication required by board of county commissioners, see N.D.C.C. § 46-05-03.

11-11-38.
Proceedings of county commissioners — Copies received as evidence.

Copies of the proceedings of the board of county commissioners, duly certified and attested by the county auditor under seal, shall be received as evidence in all courts of this state.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 22; R.C. 1895, § 1901; R.C. 1899, § 1901; R.C. 1905, § 2395; C.L. 1913, § 3269; R.C. 1943, § 11-1138.

11-11-39.
Appeal from decision of board by aggrieved person — Bond — Costs and fees payable.

An appeal may be taken to the district court from any decision of the board of county commissioners by any aggrieved person. The appellant shall file an undertaking in such reasonable sum and with such sureties as may be approved by the county auditor, conditioned that the appellant will prosecute the appeal without delay and will pay all costs adjudged against the appellant in the district court. The undertaking shall be payable to the county. The district court may at its discretion award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to appellants when three or more aggrieved persons have joined in an appeal from a decision of the board of county commissioners and the court rules in favor of the appellants.

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 21, § 46; S.L. 1883, ch. 5, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 1927; R.C. 1899, § 1927; R.C. 1905, § 2423; C.L. 1913, § 3298; R.C. 1943, § 11-1139; S.L. 1977, ch. 94, § 1.

Section Line Rights of Way.

Although a person acting as a member of the public normally has only a generalized grievance and cannot appeal a board’s decision, the specific interests of a county water resource district and other appellants in preserving the public’s right in the narrow category affecting section line rights of way made them sufficiently aggrieved for judicial review. Burleigh County Water Resource Dist. v. Burleigh County, 510 N.W.2d 624, 1994 N.D. LEXIS 2 (N.D. 1994).

11-11-40.
Appeal from decision of board by county by state’s attorney on demand. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 94, § 1.

11-11-41.
Notice.

If the decision from which an appeal is taken relates to tax refunds, tax abatements, or other matters relating to taxation, in addition to the notice of appeal required by section 28-34-01, a notice of appeal also must be served by registered mail upon the state tax commissioner.

Source:

Pol C. 1877, ch. 21, § 47; R.C. 1895, § 1928; R.C. 1899, § 1928; R.C. 1905, § 2424; C.L. 1913, § 3299; S.L. 1931, ch. 116, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 11-1141; S.L. 1989, ch. 83, § 4.